Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB422.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 13A.010 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Administrative body" means each state board, bureau, cabinet, commission, department, authority, officer, or
other entity, except the General Assembly and the Court of Justice, authorized by law to promulgate
administrative regulations;
(2) "Administrative regulation" means each statement of general applicability promulgated by an administrative
body that implements, interprets, or prescribes law or policy, or describes the organization, procedure, or
practice requirements of any administrative body. The term includes an existing administrative regulation, a
new administrative regulation, an emergency administrative regulation, an administrative regulation in
contemplation of a statute, and the amendment or repeal of an existing administrative regulation, but does not
include:
(a) Statements concerning only the internal management of an administrative body and not affecting
private rights or procedures available to the public;
(b) Declaratory rulings;
(c) Intradepartmental memoranda not in conflict with KRS 13A.130;
(d) Statements relating to acquisition of property for highway purposes and statements relating to the
construction or maintenance of highways; or
(e) Rules, regulations, and policies of the governing boards of institutions that make up the postsecondary
education system defined in KRS 164.001 pertaining to students attending or applicants to the
institutions, to faculty and staff of the respective institutions, or to the control and maintenance of land
and buildings occupied by the respective institutions;
(3) "Adopted" means that an administrative regulation has become effective in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter;
(4) "Authorizing signature" means the signature of the head of the administrative body authorized by statute to
promulgate administrative regulations;
(5) "Commission" means the Legislative Research Commission;
(6) "Effective" means an administrative regulation that has completed the legislative committee review established
by KRS 13A.290, 13A.330, and 13A.331;
(7) "Federal mandate" means any federal constitutional, legislative, or executive law or order that requires or
permits any administrative body to engage in regulatory activities that impose compliance standards, reporting
requirements, recordkeeping, or similar responsibilities upon entities in the Commonwealth;
(8) "Federal mandate comparison" means a written statement containing the information required by KRS
13A.245;
(9) "Filed" or "promulgated" means that an administrative regulation, or other document required to be filed by
this chapter, has been submitted to the Commission in accordance with this chapter;
(10) "Last effective date" means the latter of:
(a) The most recent date an ordinary administrative regulation became effective, without including the date
a technical amendment was made pursuant to KRS 13A.040(10), 13A.2255(2), or 13A.312; or
(b) The date a certification letter was filed with the regulations compiler for that administrative regulation
pursuant to KRS 13A.3104(4), if the letter stated that the administrative regulation shall remain in effect
without amendment;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(11) "Legislative committee" means an interim joint committee, a House or Senate standing committee, a statutory
committee, or a subcommittee of the Legislative Research Commission;
(12) "Local government" means and includes a city, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local
government, special district, or a quasi-governmental body authorized by the Kentucky Revised Statutes or a
local ordinance;
(13) "Major economic impact" means an overall negative or adverse economic impact from an administrative
regulation of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more on state or local government or regulated
entities, in aggregate, as determined by the promulgating administrative bodies;
(14) "Proposed administrative regulation" means an administrative regulation that:
(a) Has been filed by an administrative body; and
(b) Has not become effective or been withdrawn;
(15) "Regulatory impact analysis" means a written statement containing the provisions required by KRS 13A.240;
(16) "Signature" means the application of letters or numbers that signify the intent to sign, are uniquely linked
to the signer, and are:
(a) Produced by manual or handwritten means;
(b) An image of the manual or handwritten signature produced under paragraph (a) of this subsection;
or
(c) Produced by using a digital signature scheme or electronic confirmation method that allows for
verification of authenticity;
(17) "Small business" means a business entity, including its affiliates, that:
(a) Is independently owned and operated; and
(b) 1. Employs fewer than one hundred fifty (150) full-time employees or their equivalent; or
2. Has gross annual sales of less than six million dollars ($6,000,000);
(18)[(17)] "Statement of consideration" means the document required by KRS 13A.280 in which the
administrative body summarizes the comments received, its responses to those comments, and the action
taken, if any, as a result of those comments and responses;
(19)[(18)] "Subcommittee" means the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee of the Legislative
Research Commission;
(20)[(19)] "Tiering" means the tailoring of regulatory requirements to fit the particular circumstances surrounding
regulated entities; and
(21)[(20)] "Written comments" means comments submitted to the administrative body's contact person identified
pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d) via hand delivery, United States mail, email[e-mail], or facsimile and may
include but is not limited to comments submitted internally from within the promulgating administrative body
or from another administrative body.
Section 2. KRS 13A.040 is amended to read as follows:
The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall appoint an administrative regulations compiler who shall:
(1) Receive administrative regulations, and other documents required to be filed by the provisions of this chapter,
tendered for filing;
(2) Stamp administrative regulations tendered for filing with the time and date of receipt;
(3) Provide administrative and support services to the subcommittee;
(4) Maintain a file of administrative regulations and other documents required to be filed by this chapter, for
public inspection, with suitable indexes;
(5) Maintain a file of ineffective administrative regulations;
(6) Maintain a file of material incorporated by reference, including superseded or ineffective material incorporated
by reference;

CHAPTER 88 3
(7) Prepare the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service;
(8) Upon request, certify copies of administrative regulations and other documents that have been filed with the
regulations compiler;
(9) Correct errors that do not change the substance of an administrative regulation, including but not limited to
typographical errors, errors in format, and grammatical errors;
(10) (a) Change the following items in an administrative regulation in response to a specific written request for
a technical amendment submitted by the administrative body if the regulations compiler determines that
the requested changes do not affect the scope or substance of the administrative regulation and the
changes are provided in accordance with subsection (3) of Section 14 of this Act:
1. The administrative body's identifying information, including address, phone number, fax
number, website[Web site] address, and email[e-mail] address;
2. Typographical errors, errors in format, and grammatical errors;
3. Citations to statutes or other administrative regulations if a format change within that statute or
administrative regulation has changed the numbering or lettering of parts; or
4. Other changes in accordance with KRS 13A.312; and
(b) Notify the administrative body within thirty (30) business days of receipt of a technical amendment
letter the status of the request, including:
1. Any requested changes that are accepted as technical amendments; and
2. Any requested changes that are not accepted as technical amendments;
(11) Refuse to accept for filing administrative regulations, and other documents required to be filed by this chapter,
that do not conform to the drafting, formatting, or filing requirements established by the provisions of KRS
13A.190(5) to (11), 13A.220, 13A.222(1), (2), and (3), 13A.230,[ and] 13A.280, and Sections 14 and 16 of
this Act and notify the administrative body in writing of the reasons for refusing to accept an administrative
regulation for filing;
(12) Maintain a list of all administrative regulation numbers and the corresponding last effective date, based on the
information included in the history line of each administrative regulation; and
(13) Perform other duties required by the Commission or by a legislative committee.
Section 3. KRS 13A.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An emergency administrative regulation is an administrative regulation that:
(a) An administrative body can clearly demonstrate, through documentary evidence submitted with the
filing of the emergency administrative regulation, must be placed into effect immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, welfare, or the environment;
2. Prevent an imminent loss of federal or state funds;
3. Meet an imminent deadline for the promulgation of an administrative regulation that is
established by state statute or federal law; or
4. Comply with an executive order issued under KRS Chapter 39A; and
(b) 1. Is temporary in nature and will expire as provided in this section; or
2. Is temporary in nature and will be replaced by an ordinary administrative regulation as provided
in this section.
For the purposes of this section, "imminent" means within two hundred seventy (270) days of the filing of the
emergency administrative regulation.
(2) An agency's finding of an emergency pursuant to this section shall not be based on the agency's failure to
timely process and file administrative regulations through the ordinary administrative regulation process.
(3) An emergency administrative regulation:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Shall become effective and shall be considered as adopted upon filing;
(b) Shall be published in the Administrative Register in accordance with the publication deadline
established in KRS 13A.050(3);
(c) Shall be subject to the public comment provisions established in KRS 13A.270 and 13A.280;
(d) 1. May be reviewed at a subsequent meeting of a legislative committee after the filing of the
emergency administrative regulation; and
2. May, by a vote of the majority of the legislative committee's membership as established by KRS
13A.020(4) and 13A.290(9), be found to be deficient, and the deficiency shall be reported to the
Governor pursuant to KRS 13A.330(2); and
(e) May be amended:
1. By the promulgating administrative body after receiving public comments as established in KRS
13A.280. The amended after comments version shall:
a. Become effective upon filing; and
b. Not require a statement of emergency; or
2. At a legislative committee meeting as established in KRS 13A.320. The amendment shall be
approved as established by KRS 13A.020(4) or[and] KRS 13A.290(9). The amended version
shall become effective upon adjournment of the meeting following the procedures established in
KRS 13A.020(4) or 13A.331(1) and (2).
(4) (a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, emergency administrative regulations shall
expire two hundred seventy (270) days after the date of filing or when the same matter filed as an
ordinary administrative regulation filed for review is adopted, whichever occurs first.
(b) If an administrative body extends the time for filing a statement of consideration for an ordinary
administrative regulation as provided by KRS 13A.280(2)(b), an emergency administrative regulation
shall remain in effect for two hundred seventy (270) days after the date of filing plus the number of
days extended under the provisions of KRS 13A.280(2)(b) or when the same matter filed as an ordinary
administrative regulation filed for review is adopted, whichever occurs first.
(c) Filing an emergency amended after comments administrative regulation shall not affect the expiration
of an emergency regulation as established in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(5) Except as established in subsection (6) of this section, an emergency administrative regulation with the same
number or title or governing the same subject matter shall not be filed for a period of two hundred seventy
(270) days after it has been initially filed.
(6) If an emergency administrative regulation with the same number or title or governing the same subject matter
as an emergency administrative regulation filed within the previous two hundred seventy (270) days is filed, it
shall contain a detailed explanation of the manner in which it differs from the previously filed emergency
administrative regulation. The detailed explanation shall be included in the statement of emergency required
by subsection (7) of this section.
(7) Each emergency administrative regulation shall contain a statement of:
(a) The nature of the emergency;
(b) The reasons why an ordinary administrative regulation is not sufficient;
(c) Whether or not the emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by an ordinary administrative
regulation;
(d) If the emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by an ordinary administrative regulation,
the following statement: "The ordinary administrative regulation (is or is not) identical to this
emergency administrative regulation.";
(e) If the emergency administrative regulation will not be replaced by an ordinary administrative
regulation, the reasons therefor; and
(f) If applicable, the explanation required by subsection (6) of this section.
(8) (a) An administrative body shall attach the:

CHAPTER 88 5
1. Statement of emergency required by subsection (7) of this section to the front of the original and
each copy of a proposed emergency administrative regulation;
2. Public hearing and public comment period information required by KRS 13A.270(2), regulatory
impact analysis, tiering statement, federal mandate comparison, fiscal note, summary of material
incorporated by reference if applicable, and other forms or documents required by the provisions
of this chapter to the back of the emergency administrative regulation; and
3. Documentary evidence submitted justifying the finding of an emergency in accordance with
subsection (1) of this section to the back of the emergency regulation if it is:
a. No more than ten (10)[four (4)] pages in length; and
b. Typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8-1/2) by eleven (11) inches, and
single-sided.
Larger volumes of documentary evidence shall be filed in a separate binder,[ or] on a CD-ROM
or DVD disc, or in a different electronic format approved by the regulations compiler.
(b) An administrative body shall file with the regulations compiler:
1. The original and four (4)[five (5)] copies of the emergency administrative regulation; and
2. At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, an electronic version of the emergency
administrative regulation and the attachments required by paragraph (a) of this subsection saved
as a single document for each emergency administrative regulation in an electronic format
approved by the regulations compiler.
(c) 1. Each[The] original[ and four (4) copies of each] emergency administrative regulation shall be
single-sided and stapled in the top left corner.
2. One (1) of the copies shall be single-sided and unstapled.
3. The other three (3) copies shall be stapled in the top left corner and may be double-sided[The
fifth copy of each emergency administrative regulation shall not be stapled].
4. The original and the four (4)[five (5)] copies of each emergency administrative regulation shall
be grouped together.
(9) The statement of emergency shall have a two (2) inch top margin. The number of the emergency
administrative regulation shall be typed directly below the heading "Statement of Emergency." The number of
the emergency administrative regulation shall be the same number as the ordinary administrative regulation
followed by an "E."
(10) Each executive department emergency administrative regulation shall be signed by the head of the
administrative body and countersigned by the Governor prior to filing with the Commission. These signatures
shall be on the statement of emergency attached to the front of the emergency administrative regulation.
(11) If an emergency administrative regulation will be replaced by an ordinary administrative regulation, the
ordinary administrative regulation shall be filed at the same time as the emergency administrative regulation
that it will replace.
(12) If an ordinary administrative regulation that was filed to replace an emergency administrative regulation:
(a) Is withdrawn:
1.[(a)] The emergency administrative regulation shall expire on the date the ordinary administrative
regulation is withdrawn; and
2.[(b)] The administrative body shall inform the regulations compiler of the reasons for withdrawal in
writing; or
(b) Expires, the emergency administrative regulation shall expire on the date the ordinary administrative
regulation expires pursuant to subsection (1) of Section 15 of this Act.
(13) (a) If an emergency administrative regulation that was intended to be replaced by an ordinary
administrative regulation is withdrawn, the emergency administrative regulation shall expire on the date
it is withdrawn.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) If an emergency administrative regulation has been withdrawn, the ordinary administrative regulation
that was filed with it shall not expire unless the administrative body informs the regulations compiler
that the ordinary administrative regulation is also withdrawn.
(c) If an emergency administrative regulation is withdrawn, the administrative body shall inform the
regulations compiler of the reasons for withdrawal in writing.
(14) The administrative regulations compiler shall notify all legislative committees of the number, title, and subject
matter of all emergency administrative regulations and shall forward any additional information filed about the
emergency administrative regulation requested by a legislative committee.
Section 4. KRS 13A.220 is amended to read as follows:
All administrative regulations shall comply with the provisions of KRS 13A.222 and 13A.224.
(1) (a) An administrative body shall file with the regulations compiler:
1. The original and four (4)[five (5)] copies of an administrative regulation; and
2. At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, an electronic version of the
administrative regulation and required attachments saved as a single document for each
administrative regulation in an electronic format approved by the regulations compiler.
(b) If there are differences between the paper copy and the electronic version of an administrative
regulation filed with the regulations compiler, the electronic version shall be the controlling version.
(2) (a) Each original administrative regulation shall be single-sided and stapled in the top left corner.
(b) One (1) of the copies shall be single-sided and unstapled.
(c) The other three (3) copies[The original and four (4) copies of each administrative regulation] shall be
stapled in the top left corner and may be double-sided[. The fifth copy of each administrative regulation
shall not be stapled].
(d) The original and the four (4)[five (5)] copies of each administrative regulation shall be grouped
together.
(3) An amendment to an administrative regulation shall not be made on a copy of the administrative regulation
reproduced from the Kentucky Administrative Regulations Service or the Administrative Register. It shall be a
typed original in the format specified in subsection (4) of this section.
(4) The format of an administrative regulation shall be as follows:
(a) An administrative regulation shall be typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8-1/2) by
eleven (11) inches and shall be double-spaced through the last line of the body of the administrative
regulation. The first page shall have a two (2) inch top margin. The administrative regulation shall be
typed in a twelve (12) point font approved by the regulations compiler. The lines on each page shall be
numbered, with each page starting with line number one (1). Pages of an administrative regulation and
documents attached to the administrative regulation shall be numbered sequentially. Page numbers shall
be centered in the bottom margin of each page. Copies of the administrative regulation may be
mechanically reproduced;
(b) The regulations compiler shall place a stamp indicating the date and time of receipt of the
administrative regulation in the two (2) inch margin on the first page;
(c) The cabinet, department, and division of the administrative body shall be listed on separate double-
spaced lines two (2) inches from the top in the upper left hand corner of the first page. This shall be
followed on the next double-spaced line by "(New Administrative Regulation)," "(Amendment),"
"(Amended After Comments)," "(Repealer)," "(New Emergency Administrative Regulation),"
"(Emergency Amendment)," "(Emergency Amended After Comments)," or "(Emergency Repealer),"
whichever is applicable;
(d) The notation shall be followed by the number and title of the administrative regulation on the next
double-spaced line. The promulgating administrative body shall contact the regulations compiler prior
to filing to obtain an administrative regulation number for a new administrative regulation;
(e) On the next double-spaced line following the number and title of an administrative regulation, after the
words "RELATES TO:," the administrative body shall list all statutes and other enactments, including

CHAPTER 88 7
any branch budget bills or executive orders, to which the administrative regulation relates or which
shall be affected by the administrative regulation. After the words "STATUTORY AUTHORITY:" the
administrative body shall list the specific statutes and other enactments, where applicable, authorizing
the promulgation of the administrative regulation. Federal statutes and regulations shall be cited in the
"RELATES TO:" and "STATUTORY AUTHORITY:" sections as provided by KRS 13A.222(4)(n) and
(o); and
(f) Following the citations provided for in paragraph (e) of this subsection, and following the words
"NECESSITY, FUNCTION, AND CONFORMITY:" the administrative body shall include a brief
statement setting forth the necessity for promulgating the administrative regulation, a summary of the
functions intended to be implemented by the administrative regulation, and, if applicable, the statement
required by KRS 13A.245(2)(b).
(5) The numbering within the body of an administrative regulation shall be the responsibility of the promulgating
body, subject to the authority of the regulations compiler to divide or renumber an administrative regulation.
The following format shall be used by the administrative body in the numbering of each administrative
regulation. Each section shall begin with the word "Section" followed by an Arabic number, and titles of
sections shall be initially capitalized. Subsections shall be designated by an Arabic number in parentheses.
Paragraphs shall be designated by lower case letters of the alphabet in parentheses (e.g., (a), (b), (c), etc.).
Subparagraphs shall be designated by an Arabic number followed by a period (e.g., 1., 2., etc.). Clauses shall
be designated by lower case letters of the alphabet followed by a period (e.g., a., b., c., etc.). Subclauses shall
be designated by lower case Roman numerals in parentheses (e.g., (i), (ii), (iii), etc.). A section shall not be
divided into subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, clauses, or subclauses if there is only one (1) item in that
level of division.
(6) After the complete text of an administrative regulation, on the following page, the administrative body shall
include the following information:
(a) If the provisions of KRS 13A.120(3) are applicable, a statement that the official or the head of the
administrative body has reviewed or approved the administrative regulation; the signature of such
official or head; and the date on which such review or approval occurred;
(b) The authorizing signature of the administrative body promulgating the administrative regulation, and
the date on which the administrative body approved the promulgation;
(c) Information relating to public hearings and the public comment period required by KRS 13A.270; and
(d) The name, position, mailing address, telephone number, email[e-mail] address, and facsimile number of
the contact person of the administrative body. The contact person shall be the person authorized by the
head of an administrative body to:
1. Receive information relating to issues raised by the public or by a legislative committee prior to
a public meeting of the legislative committee;
2. Negotiate changes in language with a legislative committee in order to resolve such issues; and
3. Answer questions relating to the administrative regulation.
(7) The format for signatures required by subsection (6)(a) and (b) of this section shall be as follows:
(a) The signature shall be placed on a signature line; and
(b) The name and title of the person signing shall be typed immediately beneath the signature line.
(8) Within five (5) working days of filing an administrative regulation, an administrative body shall prominently
display on its website[Web site]:
(a) A notice that an administrative regulation has been filed with the Commission;
(b) A summary of the administrative regulation including:
1. The number of the administrative regulation;
2. The title of the administrative regulation; and
3. A brief explanation of the administrative regulation if new or the[Any] changes made if it is an
existing administrative regulation;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Information on how to access the administrative regulation on the Commission's website[Web site]; and
(d) The dates of the public comment period and the place, time, and date of the scheduled public hearing as
well as the manner in which interested parties shall submit:
1. Notification of attending the public hearing; and
2. Written comments.
(9) (a) A letter of request, notification, or withdrawal required to be filed with the regulations compiler
pursuant to this chapter may be filed electronically if the letter:
1. Is on the administrative body's official letterhead; and
2. Contains the signature of a representative of that administrative body.
(b) Paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to the letters required by KRS 13A.320(2)(b) for
amendments at a legislative committee meeting.
Section 5. KRS 13A.2251 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An administrative body shall incorporate material by reference in the last section of an administrative
regulation. This section shall include:
(a) The title of the material incorporated by reference placed in quotation marks, followed by the edition
date of the material;
(b) Information on how the material may be obtained; and
(c) A statement that the material is available for public inspection and copying, subject to copyright law, at
the main, regional, or branch offices of the administrative body, and the address and office hours of
each. Following the required statement, the administrative body shall include information that states the
administrative body's website[Web site] address or telephone number or that provides contact
information for other sources that may have the material available to the public.
(2) The section incorporating material by reference shall be titled "Incorporation by Reference".
(a) If only one (1) item is incorporated by reference, the first subsection of the section incorporating
material by reference shall contain the following statement: "(name and edition date of material
incorporated) is incorporated by reference."
(b) If more than one (1) item is incorporated by reference, the first subsection of the section incorporating
material by reference shall contain the following statement: "The following material is incorporated by
reference: (a) (name and edition date of first item incorporated); and (b) (name and edition date of
second item incorporated)."
(c) The second subsection of the section incorporating material by reference shall include the following
statement: "This material may be inspected, copied, or obtained, subject to applicable copyright law, at
(name of administrative body, full address), Monday through Friday, (state the regular office hours)."
(3) A summary of the incorporated material[, in detail sufficient to identify the subject matter to which it pertains,]
shall be attached to an administrative regulation that incorporates material by reference. This summary shall
include:
(a) The name and edition date of each item incorporated by reference[Relevant programs, statutes, funds,
rights, duties, and procedures affected by the material and the manner in which they are affected];
(b) An explanation of each item and its intended use[A citation of the specific state or federal statutes or
regulations authorizing or requiring the procedure or policy found in the material incorporated by
reference]; and
(c) The total number of pages incorporated by reference.
(4) (a) [1. ]One (1) copy of the material incorporated by reference shall be filed with the regulations
compiler when the administrative regulation is filed, and:[.]
1.[2.] For material incorporated by reference that was developed by the promulgating administrative
body:

CHAPTER 88 9
a. The material incorporated by reference shall be prominently displayed on the
administrative body's website[Web site]; and
b. The Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the address where the material may be directly
viewed on the agency's website[Web site] shall be included in the body of the
administrative regulation; or[.]
2.[3.] For material[materials] incorporated by reference that is[are] subject to a valid copyright owned
by a third party not controlled by the promulgating administrative body, the material shall be
referenced by providing sufficient information to assist in locating the material from the third
party, including the ISBN if available.
(b) Material incorporated by reference shall be placed in a binder, attached to the back of the administrative
regulation,[ or] filed on a CD-ROM or DVD, or filed in a different electronic format approved by the
regulations compiler.
1. If the material is placed in a binder, the administrative body shall indicate, on the front binder
cover and on the first page of the material incorporated by reference, the:
a. Number of the administrative regulation to which the material incorporated by reference
pertains;
b. Date on which it is filed; and
c. Citation of each item that is included in the binder.
2. The material incorporated by reference may be attached to the back of the administrative
regulation if it is:
a. No more than ten (10)[four (4)] pages in length; and
b. Typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8 1/2) by eleven (11) inches, and
single-sided.
3. The material incorporated by reference may be filed on a CD-ROM or DVD disc if the material
is saved in Adobe Portable Document Format (PDF). The administrative body shall indicate on
the disc and the disc's storage case the:
a. Number of the administrative regulation to which the material incorporated by reference
pertains;
b. Date on which it is filed; and
c. Citation of each item that is included on the disc.
(c) If the same material is incorporated by reference in more than one (1) administrative regulation, an
administrative body may file one (1) copy of the material in a binder,[ or] on a CD-ROM or DVD disc,
or in a different electronic format approved by the regulations compiler. The numbers of the
administrative regulations in which the material is incorporated by reference shall be indicated with the
other information as required by paragraph (b) of this subsection.
Section 6. KRS 13A.2255 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When an administrative body amends material that had been previously incorporated by reference, the
amendment shall be accomplished by submission of:
(a) An amendment to the administrative regulation with a new edition date for the material incorporated by
reference. The amendment shall be filed in accordance with:
1. KRS 13A.220 to initiate a change in an existing administrative regulation;
2. KRS 13A.280 to amend a proposed administrative regulation as a result of the hearing or written
comments received; or
3. KRS 13A.320 to amend a proposed administrative regulation at a legislative committee meeting;
(b) [1. ]An entire new document in which the amendments have been made but are not reflected in the
manner specified in KRS 13A.222(2), and:[.]
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1.[2.] If the new document has been developed by the promulgating administrative body, the entire
document shall be displayed prominently on the administrative body's website[Web site] and the
Uniform Resource Locator (URL) of the address where the material may be directly viewed on
the agency's website[Web site] shall be included in the body of the administrative regulation;
or[.]
2.[3.] If any materials incorporated by reference are subject to a valid copyright owned by a third party
not controlled by the promulgating administrative body, the material shall be referenced by
providing sufficient information to assist in locating the material from the third party, including
the ISBN if available;
(c) A[ detailed] summary of the amended material[changes and their effect]. This summary shall:
1. Include the name and edition date of each item incorporated by reference, an explanation of
each item's changes and their effect, and the total number of pages incorporated by
reference[a. Describe changes that are being made in the material incorporated by reference, in
sufficient detail that a person reading the summary will know the differences between the
material previously incorporated by reference and the new material; or
b. List each change in the manner required by KRS 13A.320(2)(c) and (d)]; and
2. Be attached to the back of the administrative regulation or, if part of an amendment pursuant to
KRS 13A.320, to the amendment submitted for the legislative committee meeting; and
(d) The page or pages of any document developed by the promulgating administrative body in which
changes have been made, with the changes accomplished in the manner specified in KRS 13A.222(2).
Notwithstanding KRS 13A.040(6), the regulations compiler shall not be required to keep these marked
copies once the administrative regulation has been adopted or withdrawn.
(2) (a) If the changes to the material incorporated by reference are technical in nature and authorized by KRS
13A.040(10) or 13A.312, the administrative body may submit to the regulations compiler a copy of the
revised material incorporated by reference and a detailed letter explaining what changes are made and
the reason for the changes.
(b) If the regulations compiler determines that the requested change does not affect the substance of the
material incorporated by reference and that the change is authorized by KRS 13A.040(10) or 13A.312,
the edition date stated in the administrative regulation shall be changed to match the edition date on the
revised material and the history line of that administrative regulation shall note that a technical
amendment was made.
(c) If the requested change affects the substance of the material incorporated by reference or is not
authorized by KRS 13A.040(10) or 13A.312, the administrative body shall comply with subsection (1)
of this section.
Section 7. KRS 13A.240 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every administrative body shall prepare and submit to the Legislative Research Commission an original and
four (4)[five (5)] duplicate copies of a regulatory impact analysis for every administrative regulation when it is
filed with the Commission. The regulatory impact analysis shall include the following information:
(a) The number of the administrative regulation;
(b) The name, email[e-mail] address, and telephone number of the contact person of the administrative
body identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d), and, if applicable, the name, email[e-mail] address,
and telephone number of an alternate person to be contacted with specific questions about the
regulatory impact analysis;
(c) A brief narrative summary of:
1. What the administrative regulation does;
2. The necessity of the administrative regulation;
3. How the administrative regulation conforms to the content of the authorizing statutes; and
4. How the administrative regulation currently assists or will assist in the effective administration of
the statutes;

CHAPTER 88 11
(d) If this is an amendment to an existing administrative regulation, a brief narrative summary of:
1. How the amendment will change the existing administrative regulation;
2. The necessity of the amendment to the administrative regulation;
3. How the amendment conforms to the content of the authorizing statutes; and
4. How the amendment to the administrative regulation will assist in the effective administration of
the statutes;
(e) At least three (3) subject index headings reflecting the content of the administrative regulation
selected from a list provided by the regulations compiler;
(f) The type and number of individuals, businesses, organizations, or state and local governments affected
by the administrative regulation;
(g)[(f)] An analysis of how the entities referenced in paragraph (f)[(e)] of this subsection will be
impacted by either the implementation of this administrative regulation, if new, or by the change if it is
an amendment to an existing administrative regulation. The analysis shall include but not be limited to:
1. A detailed explanation of the actions the entities referenced in paragraph (f)[(e)] of this
subsection will be required to undertake in order to comply with the proposed administrative
regulation;
2. An estimate of the costs imposed on entities referenced in paragraph (f)[(e)] of this subsection in
order to comply with the proposed administrative regulation; and
3. The benefits that may accrue to the entities referenced in paragraph (f)[(e)] of this subsection as a
result of compliance;
(h)[(g)] An estimate of how much it will cost the administrative body to implement this administrative
regulation, both initially and on a continuing basis;
(i) Whether the administrative regulation or amendment implements legislation from the previous five
(5) years, and if so:
1. The bill number and year; or
2. The Kentucky Acts chapter and year;
(j)[(h)] The source of the funding to be used for the implementation and enforcement of the
administrative regulation or amendment;
(k)[(i)] An assessment of whether an increase in fees or funding will be necessary to implement this
administrative regulation or amendment to an existing administrative regulation;
(l)[(j)] A statement as to whether or not this administrative regulation establishes any fees or directly or
indirectly increases any fees; and
(m)[(k)] The tiering statement required by KRS 13A.210.
(2) The Legislative Research Commission shall review all regulatory impact analyses submitted by all
administrative bodies, and may require any administrative body to submit background data upon which the
information required by subsection (1) of this section is based, and an explanation of how the data was
gathered.
Section 8. KRS 13A.250 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An administrative body that promulgates an administrative regulation shall consider the cost that the
administrative regulation may cause state or local government and regulated entities to incur.
(2) (a) A two (2) part cost analysis shall be completed for each administrative regulation.
(b) The first part of the cost analysis shall include the projected cost or cost savings to the Commonwealth
of Kentucky and each of its affected agencies, and the projected cost or cost savings to affected local
governments, including cities, counties, fire departments, and school districts.
(c) The second part of the cost analysis shall include the projected cost or cost savings to the regulated
entities affected by the administrative regulation.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) Agencies or entities affected by the administrative regulation may submit comments in accordance with
KRS 13A.270(1) to the promulgating administrative body or to a legislative committee reviewing the
administrative regulation.
(3) Each administrative body that promulgates an administrative regulation shall prepare and submit with the
administrative regulation a fiscal note. The fiscal note shall state:
(a) The number of the administrative regulation;
(b) The name, email[e-mail] address, and telephone number of the contact person of the administrative
body identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d), and, if applicable, the name, email[e-mail] address,
and telephone number of an alternate person to be contacted with specific questions about the fiscal
note;
(c) Each unit, part, or division of state or local government the administrative regulation will affect;
(d) In detail, the aspect or service of state or local government to which the administrative regulation
relates, including identification of the applicable state or federal statute or regulation that mandates the
aspect or service or authorizes the action taken by the administrative regulation;
(e) The estimated effect of the administrative regulation on the expenditures and revenues of a state or local
government agency or regulated entity for the first full year and for subsequent years the
administrative regulation will be in effect. The administrative body shall provide a narrative to explain
the fiscal impact of the administrative regulation and the methodology and resources it used to
determine the fiscal impact; and
(f) 1. The conclusion of the promulgating administrative body as to whether the administrative
regulation will have a major economic impact on[, as defined in KRS 13A.010, to] state and
local government and regulated entities for the first full year the administrative regulation will
be in effect and for subsequent years if different;[,] and
2. An explanation of the methodology and resources used by the administrative body to reach this
conclusion.
(4) If an administrative body files an amendment to an administrative regulation pursuant to subsection (3) of
Section 16 of this Act for a legislative committee meeting, the administrative body shall:
(a) Consider the cost of the amendment as established in subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) Prepare and submit a fiscal note as established in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Any administrative body may request the advice and assistance of the Commission in the preparation of the
fiscal note.
Section 9. KRS 13A.255 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Within five (5) working days of[ the] filing[ of] an emergency or ordinary administrative regulation that
would[proposes to] establish or increase fees, except those fees exempted by KRS 13A.100(3), an
administrative body shall mail or email[e-mail] a notice containing the information required by
subsection (2) of this section, to each state association, organization, or other body representing a
person or entity affected by the administrative regulation.
(b) If an emergency administrative regulation is filed with an identical ordinary administrative
regulation, the administrative body may include both administrative regulations in the same notice.
(2) The notice shall include the following information:
(a) The name of the administrative body that filed the[ proposed] administrative regulation;
(b) A statement that the administrative body has promulgated an administrative regulation that establishes
or increases fees;
(c) A summary of the administrative regulation that includes:
1. The amount of each fee being established;
2. The amount of any increases to any fees previously established; and
3. The necessity for the establishment or increase in the fees;

CHAPTER 88 13
(d) A statement that a person or entity may contact the administrative body for additional information;
(e) The time, date, and place of the scheduled public hearing;
(f) The deadline for submitting written comments as established in KRS 13A.270(1)(c); and
(g) The name, mailing address, email[e-mail] address, and telephone number of the contact person for the
administrative body identified pursuant to KRS 13A.220(6)(d).
Section 10. KRS 13A.270 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) In addition to the public comment period required by paragraph (c) of this subsection, following
publication in the Administrative Register of the text of an administrative regulation, the administrative
body shall, unless authorized to cancel the hearing pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, hold a
hearing, open to the public, on the administrative regulation.
(b) The public hearing for an:
1. Ordinary administrative regulation shall not be held before the twenty-first day or after the last
workday of the month following the month in which the administrative regulation is published in
the Administrative Register; or
2. Emergency administrative regulation shall not be held before the twenty-first day or after the last
workday of the month in which the administrative regulation is published in the Administrative
Register.
Nothing in this paragraph shall preclude the administrative body from holding additional public
hearings in addition to the hearing mandated in subparagraph 1. or 2. of this paragraph.
(c) The administrative body shall accept written comments regarding the administrative regulation during
the comment period. The comment period shall begin on the date the administrative regulation is filed
with the regulations compiler and:
1. For an ordinary administrative regulation, shall run until 11:59 p.m. on the last day of the
calendar month following the month in which the administrative regulation was published in the
Administrative Register; or
2. For an emergency administrative regulation, shall run until 11:59 p.m. on the last day of the
calendar month in which the administrative regulation is published in the Administrative
Register.
(2) Each administrative regulation shall state:
(a) The place, time, and date of the scheduled public hearing;
(b) The manner in which interested persons shall submit their:
1. Notification of attending the public hearing; and
2. Written comments;
(c) That notification of attending the public hearing shall be transmitted to the administrative body no later
than five (5) workdays prior to the date of the scheduled public hearing;
(d) The deadline for submitting written comments regarding the administrative regulation in accordance
with subsection (1)(c) of this section; and
(e) The name, position, mailing address, email[e-mail] address, and telephone and facsimile numbers of the
person to whom a notification and written comments shall be transmitted.
(3) (a) A person who wishes to be notified that an administrative body has filed an administrative regulation
shall:
1. Contact the administrative body by telephone or written letter to request that the administrative
body send the information required by paragraph[ (c) or] (d) or (e) of this subsection to the
person; or
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Complete an electronic registration form located on a centralized state government website[Web
site] developed and maintained by the Commonwealth Office of Technology pursuant to
subsection (13) of this section.
(b) A registration submitted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection shall:
1. Indicate whether the person wishes to receive notification regarding:
a. All administrative regulations promulgated by an administrative body; or
b. Each administrative regulation that relates to a specified subject area. The subject areas
shall be provided by the administrative bodies and shall be listed on the centralized state
government website[Web site] in alphabetical order;
2. Include a request for the person to provide an email[e-mail] address in order to receive
regulatory information electronically;
3. Be valid for a period of four (4) years from the date the registration is submitted, or until the
person submits a written request to be removed from the notification list, whichever occurs first;
and
4. Be transmitted to the promulgating administrative body, if the registration was made through the
centralized state government website[Web site]. The collected email[e-mail] addresses shall be
used solely for the purposes of this subsection and shall not be sold, transferred, or otherwise
made available to third parties, other than the promulgating administrative body.
(c) An administrative body that promulgates administrative regulations shall:
1. Request that the Commonwealth Office of Technology add it to the centralized state
government website if the administrative body is not already included;
2. Maintain a list of registrations transmitted to the body pursuant to paragraph (b)4. of this
subsection;
3. Establish a method to transfer the registrations if there are personnel changes or other
disruptions; and
4. Communicate updates to subject areas and contact persons to the Commonwealth Office of
Technology as needed.
(d) A copy of the administrative regulation as filed, and all attachments required by KRS 13A.230(1), shall
be emailed by the administrative body[e-mailed]:
1. To every person who has:
a. Registered pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
b. Provided an email[e-mail] address as part of the registration request;
2. Within five (5) working days after the date the administrative regulation is filed with the
Commission; and
3. With a request from the administrative body that affected individuals, businesses, or other
entities submit written comments that identify the anticipated effects of the proposed
administrative regulation.
(e)[(d)] Within five (5) working days after the date the administrative regulation is filed with the
Commission, the administrative body shall mail the following information to every person who has
registered pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection but did not provide an email[e-mail] address:
1. A cover letter from the administrative body requesting that affected individuals, businesses, or
other entities submit written comments that identify the anticipated effects of the proposed
administrative regulation;
2. A copy of the regulatory impact analysis required by KRS 13A.240 completed in detail sufficient
to put the individual on notice as to the specific contents of the administrative regulation,
including all proposed amendments to the administrative regulation; and

CHAPTER 88 15
3. A statement that a copy of the administrative regulation may be obtained from the Commission's
website[Web site], which can be accessed on-line through public libraries or any computer with
internet access. The Commission's website[Web site] address shall be included in the statement.
[(e) An administrative body shall not be required to send a copy of an administrative regulation that was
amended after comments in accordance with KRS 13A.280 to persons who have registered pursuant to
paragraph (a) of this subsection, unless the person requested a copy pursuant to KRS 13A.280(8).]
(4) (a) If small business may be impacted by an administrative regulation, the administrative body shall
email[e-mail] a copy of the administrative regulation as filed, and all attachments required by KRS
13A.230(1), to the chief executive officer of the Commission on Small Business Innovation and
Advocacy within five (5) working days[one (1) working day] after the date the administrative
regulation is filed with the Commission.
(b) The email[e-mail] shall include a request from the administrative body that the Commission on Small
Business Innovation and Advocacy review the administrative regulation in accordance with KRS
11.202(1)(e) and submit its report or comments in accordance with the deadline established in
subsection (1)(c) of this section. A copy of the report shall be filed with the regulations compiler.
(c) An administrative body shall not be required to send a copy of an administrative regulation that was
amended after comments in accordance with KRS 13A.280 to the Commission on Small Business
Innovation and Advocacy, unless its chief executive officer requested a copy pursuant to KRS
13A.280(8).
(5) (a) If a local government may be impacted by an administrative regulation, the administrative body shall
send, by email[e-mail] if the local government has an email[e-mail] address, a copy of the
administrative regulation as filed and all attachments required by KRS 13A.230(1) to each impacted
local government in the state within five (5) working days[one (1) working day] after the date the
administrative regulation is filed with the Commission. If the local government does not have an
email[e-mail] address, the material shall not be sent.
(b) The email[e-mail] shall include a request from the administrative body that the local government
review the administrative regulation in the same manner as would the Commission on Small Business
Innovation and Advocacy under KRS 11.202(1)(e), and submit its report or comments in accordance
with the deadline established in subsection (1)(c) of this section. A copy of the report or comments shall
be filed with the regulations compiler.
(c) An administrative body shall not be required to send a copy of an administrative regulation that was
amended after comments in accordance with KRS 13A.280 to a local government, unless its contact
person requested a copy pursuant to KRS 13A.280(8).
(6) Persons desiring to be heard at the hearing shall notify the administrative body in writing as to their desire to
appear and testify at the hearing not less than five (5) workdays before the scheduled date of the hearing.
(7) The administrative body shall immediately notify the regulations compiler by letter if:
(a) No written notice of intent to attend the public hearing is received by the administrative body at least
five (5) workdays before the scheduled hearing, and it chooses to cancel the public hearing; and
(b) No written comments have been received by the close of the last day of the public comment period.
(8) (a) 1. Upon receipt from interested persons of their intent to attend a public hearing, the administrative
body shall notify the regulations compiler by letter that the public hearing shall be held.
2. If the public hearing is held but no comments are received during the hearing, the administrative
body shall notify the regulations compiler by letter that the public hearing was held and that no
comments were received.
(b) Upon receipt of written comments, the administrative body shall notify the regulations compiler by
letter that written comments have been received.
(9) If the notifications required by subsections (7) and (8) of this section are not received by the regulations
compiler by close of business on the second workday of the calendar month following the end of the public
comment period, the administrative regulation shall be deferred to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the
subcommittee.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(10) The notifications required by subsections (7) and (8) of this section shall be made by letter. The letter may be
sent by email[e-mail] if the administrative body uses an electronic signature and letterhead for the emailed[e-
mailed] document.
(11) Every hearing shall be conducted in such a manner as to guarantee each person who wishes to offer comment a
fair and reasonable opportunity to do so, whether or not such person has given the notice contemplated by
subsection (6) of this section. No transcript need be taken of the hearing, unless a written request for a
transcript is made, in which case the person requesting the transcript shall have the responsibility of paying for
same. A recording may be made in lieu of a transcript under the same terms and conditions as a transcript. This
section shall not preclude an administrative body from making a transcript or making a recording if it so
desires.
(12) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each administrative regulation.
Administrative regulations may be grouped at the convenience of the administrative body for purposes of
hearings required by this section.
(13) The centralized state government website that provides for the notification of the filing of administrative
regulations and amendments to existing administrative regulations shall provide:
(a) The electronic registration notification form required by subsection (3)(a) of this section;
(b) Up-to-date contact information and subject areas for promulgating administrative bodies; and
(c) A form or contact information for an administrative body to:
1. Request to be added to the website if not already included; and
2. Add or change its subject areas and contact persons published on the website.
Section 11. KRS 13A.280 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Following the last day of the comment period, the administrative body shall give consideration to all
comments received at the public hearing and all written comments received during the comment period,
including:
(a) Any report filed by the Commission on Small Business Innovation and Advocacy in accordance with
KRS 11.202(1)(e) and 13A.270(4), or by a local government in accordance with KRS 11.202(1)(e) and
13A.270(5); and
(b) Any comments regarding the administrative regulation's major economic impact[, as defined in KRS
13A.010,] as submitted by agencies, local governments, or regulated entities.
(2) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the administrative body shall file with the
Commission on or before 12 noon, eastern time, on the fifteenth day of the calendar month following
the end of the public comment period the statement of consideration relating to the administrative
regulation and, if applicable, the amended after comments version.
(b) If the administrative body has received a significant number of public comments:
1. It may extend the time for filing the statement of consideration for an ordinary administrative
regulation and, if applicable, the amended after comments version by notifying the regulations
compiler in writing on or before 12 noon, eastern time, on the fifteenth day of the calendar month
following the end of the public comment period; and
2. The administrative body shall file the statement of consideration for an ordinary administrative
regulation and, if applicable, the amended after comments version, with the Commission on or
before 12 noon, eastern time, no later than the fifteenth day of the second calendar month
following the end of the public comment period.
(3) (a) If the administrative regulation is amended as a result of the hearing or written comments received, the
administrative body shall file[forward] the items specified in this paragraph with[to] the regulations
compiler by 12 noon, eastern time, on the applicable deadline specified in subsection (2) of this section:
1. The original and four (4)[five (5)] copies of the administrative regulation indicating any
amendments resulting from comments received at the public hearing and during the comment
period. The amendments shall be indicated in:
a. The original wording for an ordinary administrative regulation;[ or]

CHAPTER 88 17
b. The original wording for an emergency administrative regulation; or
c. The wording of an emergency administrative regulation as amended, for an emergency
administrative regulation that was amended at a legislative committee meeting pursuant to
KRS 13A.190(3);
2. The original and four (4)[five (5)] copies of the statement of consideration as required by
subsection (2) of this section, attached to the back of the original and each copy of the
administrative regulation; and
3. The regulatory impact analysis, tiering statement, federal mandate comparison if applicable,
and[or] fiscal note[ on local government]. These documents shall reflect changes resulting from
amendments made after the public hearing.
(b) 1. Each[The] original[ and four (4) copies of the] amended after comments version, the statement
of consideration, and the attachments required by paragraph (a)3. of this subsection shall be
single-sided and stapled in the top left corner.
2. One (1) of the copies shall be single-sided and unstapled.
3. The other three (3) copies shall be stapled in the top left corner and may be double-sided[The
fifth copy shall not be stapled].
(c) At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, the administrative body shall file an electronic
version of the amended after comments version, the statement of consideration, and the required
attachments saved as a single document for each amended after comments administrative regulation in
an electronic format approved by the regulations compiler.
(d) Within five (5) working days after filing an amended after comments version, an administrative body
shall:
1. Prominently display on its website:
a. A notice that an amended after comments version has been filed with the Commission;
b. A summary of the amended after comments version including:
i. The number of the administrative regulation;
ii. The title of the administrative regulation; and
iii. A brief explanation of the changes made; and
c. Information on how to access the amended after comments version on the
Commission's website; and
2. Email the amended after comments version and statement of consideration as filed, and all
attachments required by paragraph (a)3. of this subsection, to every person who has registered
pursuant to subsection (3)(a)2. of Section 10 of this Act and provided an email address as part
of the registration request.
(e) Material incorporated by reference that is amended after comments shall be filed, and if applicable,
displayed in the manner required by Section 6 of this Act.
(4) (a) If the administrative regulation is not amended as a result of the public hearing, or written comments
received, the administrative body shall file the original and four (4)[five (5)] copies of the statement of
consideration with the regulations compiler by 12 noon, eastern time, on the deadline established in
subsection (2) of this section.
1. Each original statement of consideration shall be single-sided and stapled in the top left
corner.
2. One (1) of the copies shall be single-sided and unstapled.
3. The other three (3) copies[The original and four (4) copies of the statement of consideration]
shall be stapled in the top left corner and may be double-sided[. The fifth copy of each statement
of consideration shall not be stapled].
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) If the statement of consideration covers multiple administrative regulations that were not amended as a
result of the public hearing or written comments received[, as authorized by subsection (6)(g)1. of this
section], the administrative body shall file with the regulations compiler:
1. The original and four (4)[five (5)] copies of the statement of consideration as required by
paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
2. Two (2) additional unstapled, single-sided copies of the statement of consideration for each
additional administrative regulation included in the group of administrative regulations.
(c) At the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, the administrative body shall file an electronic
version of the statement of consideration saved as a single document for each statement of consideration
in an electronic format approved by the regulations compiler.
(5) (a) If comments are received either at the public hearing or during the public comment period, the
administrative regulation shall be deferred to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the subcommittee
following the month in which the statement of consideration is due.
(b) A filed administrative regulation that is deferred under this subsection due to receipt of public
comments may still be placed on the subcommittee's agenda for informational review pursuant to
subsection (3) or (4) of Section 18 of this Act.
(c) If a filed administrative regulation is placed on the agenda pursuant to paragraph (b) of this
subsection, the full review of the filed administrative regulation shall still be deferred in accordance
with this subsection.
(6) The format for the statement of consideration shall be as follows:
(a) The statement shall be typewritten on white paper, size eight and one-half (8-1/2) by eleven (11) inches.
Copies of the statement may be mechanically reproduced;
(b) The first page of the statement of consideration shall have a two (2) inch top margin;
(c) The heading of the statement shall consist of the words "STATEMENT OF CONSIDERATION
RELATING TO" followed by the number of the administrative regulation that was the subject of the
public hearing and comment period and the name of the promulgating administrative body. The heading
shall be centered. This shall be followed by the words "Not Amended After Comments," "Emergency
Not Amended After Comments," "Amended After Comments," or "Emergency Amended After
Comments," whichever is applicable;
(d) If a hearing has been held or written comments received, the heading is to be followed by:
1. A statement setting out the date, time and place of the hearing, if the hearing was held;
2. A list of those persons who attended the hearing or who submitted comments and the
organization, agency, or other entity represented, if applicable; and
3. The name and title of the representative of the promulgating administrative body;
(e) 1. Following the general information, the promulgating administrative body shall summarize the
comments received at the public hearing and during the comment period and the response of the
promulgating administrative body. Each subject commented upon shall be summarized in a
separate numbered paragraph. Each numbered paragraph shall contain two (2) subsections:
a.[1.] Subsection (a) shall be labeled "Comment," shall identify the name of the person, and the
organization represented if applicable, who made the comment, and shall contain a
summary of the comment; and
b.[2.] Subsection (b) shall be labeled "Response" and shall contain the response to the comment
by the promulgating administrative body.
2. If administrative regulations were considered as a group and a comment relates to one (1) or
more of the administrative regulations, the summary of the comment and response shall
specify each administrative regulation to which it applies;
(f) 1. Following the summary of the[and] comments and responses, the promulgating administrative
body shall [:

CHAPTER 88 19
1. ]summarize the statement of consideration and the action taken by the administrative body as a
result of comments received at the public hearing and during the comment period.[; and ]
2. If administrative regulations were considered as a group, a separate summary and action
taken shall be provided for each administrative regulation[If amended after the comment
period, list the changes made to the administrative regulation in the format prescribed by KRS
13A.320(2)(c) and (d)]; and
(g)[ 1. If administrative regulations were considered as a group at a public hearing, one (1) statement of
consideration may include the group of administrative regulations. If a comment relates to one
(1) or more of the administrative regulations in the group, the summary of the comment and
response shall specify each administrative regulation to which it applies.
2.] Emergency administrative regulations shall be in a separate statement of consideration from
ordinary administrative regulations.
(7) If the administrative regulation is amended pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the full text of the
administrative regulation shall be published in the Administrative Register. The changes made to the
administrative regulation shall be typed in bold and made in the format prescribed by KRS 13A.222(2). The
administrative regulation shall be reviewed by the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee after such
publication.
(8) If requested, copies of the statement of consideration and, if applicable, the amended after comments version
of the administrative regulation shall be made available by the promulgating administrative body to persons
attending the hearing or submitting comments or who specifically request a copy from the administrative body.
Section 12. KRS 13A.290 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided by KRS 158.6471 and 158.6472, the Administrative Regulation Review
Subcommittee shall meet monthly to review administrative regulations prior to close of business on the
fifteenth day of the calendar month.
(b) The agenda shall:
1. Include each administrative regulation that completed the public comment process;
2. Include each administrative regulation for which a statement of consideration was received on or
before 12 noon, eastern time, on the fifteenth day of the prior calendar month;
3. Include each effective administrative regulation or administrative regulation filed with the
Commission that the subcommittee has decided to review pursuant to subsection (3) of Section
18 of this Act;
4. Include each administrative regulation required to be on the agenda pursuant to subsection
(4) of Section 18 of this Act;
5. Include each administrative regulation that was deferred from the prior month's meeting of the
subcommittee; and
6.[5.] Not include an administrative regulation that is deferred, withdrawn, expired, or automatically
taken off the agenda under the provisions of this chapter, unless it is being reviewed pursuant to
subsection (3) or (4) of Section 18 of this Act.
(c) Review of an administrative regulation shall include the entire administrative regulation and all
attachments filed with the administrative regulation. The review of amendments to existing
administrative regulations shall not be limited to only the changes proposed by the promulgating
administrative body.
(2) The meetings shall be open to the public.
(3) Public notice of the time, date, and place of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee meeting
shall be given in the Administrative Register.
(4) (a) A representative of the administrative body for an administrative regulation on the agenda[under
consideration] shall be present to explain the administrative regulation and to answer questions thereon.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) If a representative of an[the] administrative body with authority to amend, defer, and answer questions
about a filed ordinary or emergency administrative regulation that is on the agenda for full review
fails to appear before[is not present at the subcommittee meeting, the administrative regulation shall be
deferred to the next regularly scheduled meeting of] the subcommittee, the subcommittee may:
1. Defer the administrative regulation to the next regularly scheduled meeting of the
subcommittee; and
2. Make a determination pursuant to subsections (2), (3), and (4) of Section 18 of this Act or
subsection (3) of Section 3 of this Act.
(c) If a representative of an administrative body with authority to defer and answer questions about an[for
an effective] administrative regulation that was placed on the agenda for informational review
pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of Section 18 of this Act fails to appear before the subcommittee, the
subcommittee may:
1. Defer the informational review of the administrative regulation to the next regularly scheduled
meeting of the subcommittee; and[or]
2. Make a determination pursuant to KRS 13A.030(2), (3), and (4), or KRS 13A.190(3).
(5) Following the meeting and before the next regularly scheduled meeting of the Commission, the Administrative
Regulation Review Subcommittee shall forward to the Commission its findings, recommendations, or other
comments it deems appropriate in writing.[ The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall also
forward to the Commission its findings, recommendations, or other comments it deems appropriate on an
effective administrative regulation it has reviewed.] The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee's
findings shall be published in the Administrative Register.
(6) (a) After review by the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee, the Commission shall, on the
first Wednesday of the following month, or if the first Wednesday is a legal holiday, the next workday
of the month:[,]
1. Assign a filed administrative regulation to a legislative committee with subject matter
jurisdiction if the administrative regulation was on the agenda for full review pursuant to
subsection (1)(b)1., 2., or 5. of this section; and
2. Not assign a filed administrative regulation to a legislative committee with subject matter
jurisdiction if the administrative regulation was solely on the agenda for informational review
pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of Section 18 of this Act.
(b) Upon notification of the assignment by the Commission, the legislative committee to which the
administrative regulation is assigned shall notify the regulations compiler:
1. Of the date, time, and place of the meeting at which it will consider the administrative regulation;
or
2. That it will not meet to consider the administrative regulation.
(7) (a) Within ninety (90) days of the assignment, the legislative committee may hold a public meeting during
which the administrative regulation shall be reviewed.
(b) If the ninetieth day of the assignment falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday, the deadline for review
shall be the workday following the Saturday, Sunday, or holiday.
(c) 1. If the administrative regulation is assigned to an interim joint committee and a session of the
General Assembly begins during the review period, the assignment shall transfer to the Senate
and House standing committees with subject matter jurisdiction.
2. If the administrative regulation is assigned to Senate and House standing committees and a
session of the General Assembly adjourns sine die during the review period, the assignment shall
transfer to the interim joint committee with subject matter jurisdiction.
3. An administrative regulation may be transferred more than one (1) time under this paragraph. A
transfer shall not extend the review period established by this subsection.
(d) Notice of the time, date, and place of the meeting shall be placed in the legislative calendar.

CHAPTER 88 21
(8) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section, a legislative committee shall be empowered to make the
same determinations and to exercise the same authority as the Administrative Regulation Review
Subcommittee, including all powers and restrictions relating to informational reviews conducted under
subsection (3) or (4) of Section 18 of this Act.
(9) (a) This subsection shall apply to ordinary and emergency administrative regulations filed with the
Commission and reviewed pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.
(b) A majority of the entire membership of the legislative committee shall constitute a quorum for purposes
of reviewing administrative regulations.
(c) In order to amend an administrative regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.320, defer an administrative
regulation pursuant to KRS 13A.300, or find an administrative regulation deficient pursuant to KRS
13A.030(2), (3), or (4) or 13A.190(3), the motion to amend, defer, or find deficient shall be approved
by a majority of the entire membership of the legislative committee. Additionally, during a session of
the General Assembly, standing committees of the Senate and House of Representatives shall agree in
order to amend an administrative regulation, defer an administrative regulation, or find an
administrative regulation deficient by:
1. Meeting separately; or
2. Meeting jointly. If the standing committees meet jointly, it shall require a majority vote of Senate
members voting and a majority of House members voting, as well as the majority vote of the
entire membership of the standing committees meeting jointly, in order to take action on the
administrative regulation.
(10) (a) The quorum requirements of subsection (9)(b) of this section shall apply to an effective or filed
administrative regulation that is under informational review by a legislative committee pursuant to
subsection (3) or (4) of Section 18 of this Act and subsection (8) of this section.
(b) A motion to defer the informational review of an[find an effective] administrative regulation or find
the administrative regulation deficient shall be approved by:
1. A majority of the entire membership of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee; or
2. A legislative committee in accordance with subsection (9)(c) of this section.
(11) (a) Upon adjournment of the meeting at which a legislative committee has considered an administrative
regulation pursuant to subsection (7) or (10) of this section, the legislative committee shall inform the
regulations compiler of its findings, recommendations, or other action taken on the administrative
regulation.
(b) Following the meeting and before the next regularly scheduled meeting of the Commission, the
legislative committee shall forward to the Commission its findings, recommendations, or other
comments it deems appropriate in writing. The legislative committee's findings shall be published in the
Administrative Register.
Section 13. KRS 13A.300 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The administrative body that promulgated an administrative regulation may request that consideration of the
administrative regulation be deferred by a legislative committee.
(2) The deferral of an administrative regulation scheduled for full review by the Administrative Regulation
Review Subcommittee pursuant to subsection (1)(b)1., 2., or 5. of Section 12 of this Act shall be governed by
KRS 13A.020(4) and the following:
(a) A request for deferral of an ordinary administrative regulation filed with the Commission shall be
automatically granted if:
1. The administrative body submits a written letter to the regulations compiler; and
2. The letter is received by 12 noon, eastern time, at least five (5) calendar days prior to the
subcommittee meeting;
(b) A request for deferral of an[ effective administrative regulation or an] emergency administrative
regulation may be granted if:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. The administrative body submits a written letter to the regulations compiler;
2. The letter is received prior to the subcommittee meeting; and
3. Approved by the co-chairs of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee;
(c) A request for deferral may be granted at the discretion of the subcommittee if the request is made by the
administrative body orally at a meeting of the subcommittee;
(d) The subcommittee may request that consideration of an administrative regulation be deferred by the
promulgating administrative body. Upon receipt of the request, the promulgating administrative body
may agree to defer consideration of the administrative regulation;
(e) Except as provided in paragraph (g)[(f)] of this subsection, an administrative regulation that has been
deferred for full review shall be placed on the agenda of the next scheduled meeting of the
subcommittee. [If it is an administrative regulation filed with the Commission, ]The subcommittee shall
consider the administrative regulation as if it had met all other requirements of filing. Repromulgation
shall not be required in those cases;[ and]
(f) 1. A filed administrative regulation deferred under this subsection may still be placed on the
agenda pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of Section 18 of this Act for informational review.
2. If a filed administrative regulation is placed on the agenda pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph, the full review of the filed administrative regulation shall still be deferred in
accordance with this subsection; and
(g) An administrative regulation shall not be deferred under this subsection more than twelve (12) times.
(3)[ (a)] The deferral of an informational review for an[a filed ordinary] administrative regulation scheduled by
the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee pursuant to subsection (1)(b)3. or 4. of Section 12 of
this Act[referred to a second legislative committee or committees pursuant to KRS 13A.290(6) and (7)] shall
be governed by KRS 13A.020(4) and the following:[this subsection and the voting requirements of KRS
13A.290(9).]
(a)[(b) 1.] A request to defer an informational review for an administrative regulation that was placed on
the subcommittee's agenda may be[for deferral shall be automatically] granted if:
1.[a.] The administrative body submits a written letter to the regulations compiler;[ and]
2.[b.] The letter is received prior to the subcommittee[legislative committee] meeting; and
3. Approved by the co-chairs of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee;
(b)[2.] A request for deferral may be granted at the discretion of the subcommittee[second legislative
committee] if the request is made by the administrative body orally at a meeting of the
subcommittee[legislative committee]; and[
3. The legislative committee may request that consideration of an administrative regulation be
deferred by the promulgating administrative body. Upon receipt of the request, the promulgating
administrative body may agree to defer consideration of the administrative regulation.]
(c)[ 1.] An informational review for an administrative regulation that is deferred may be placed on the[a
subsequent] agenda of the next scheduled meeting of the subcommittee[legislative committee or
committees within the review period.
2. If a filed ordinary administrative regulation that has been deferred is not placed on a subsequent
agenda within the review period, the administrative regulation shall take effect at the expiration
of the review period].
(4) (a) The deferral of a filed ordinary or emergency[an effective] administrative regulation assigned to a
second[or an emergency administrative regulation under review by a] legislative committee or
committees for full review pursuant to subsections (6) and (7) of Section 12 of this Act shall be
governed by this subsection and the voting requirements of KRS 13A.290(9).
(b) A request for deferral may be granted if:
1. The administrative body submits a written letter to the regulations compiler;
2. The letter is received:

CHAPTER 88 23
a. Prior to the legislative committee meeting for an emergency administrative regulation;
or
b. By 12 noon, eastern time, at least five (5) calendar days prior to the legislative
committee meeting for an ordinary administrative regulation; and
3. Approved by the presiding chair or chairs.
(c) A request for deferral may be granted at the discretion of the second legislative committee if the request
is made by the administrative body orally at a meeting of the legislative committee.
(d) 1. At a meeting of a legislative committee, the legislative committee may request that consideration
of an administrative regulation be deferred by the administrative body. Upon receipt of the
request, the administrative body may agree to defer consideration of the administrative
regulation.
2.[(e)] An administrative regulation that is deferred for full review may be placed on a subsequent
agenda of the legislative committee or committees within the review period.
3. Except as provided by subparagraph 4. of this paragraph, if a filed ordinary administrative
regulation that has been deferred for full review is not placed on a subsequent agenda within
the review period, the administrative regulation shall take effect at the expiration of the review
period.
4. a. If requested by the administrative body, an administrative regulation may be deferred
beyond the review period for an additional ninety (90) days if the deferral is requested
and approved as established by paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection.
b. If a filed ordinary administrative regulation that has been deferred is not placed on a
subsequent agenda within the additional ninety (90) days, the administrative regulation
shall take effect at the expiration of the additional ninety (90) days.
(e) 1. A filed administrative regulation deferred under this subsection may still be placed on the
agenda for informational review pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of Section 18 of this Act and
subsection (8) of Section 12 of this Act.
2. If a filed administrative regulation is placed on the agenda pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this
paragraph, the full review of the filed administrative regulation may be scheduled by the
legislative committee at a subsequent meeting during the ninety (90) day review period.
(5) (a) The deferral of an informational review for an administrative regulation scheduled by a second
legislative committee pursuant to subsection (3) or (4) of Section 18 of this Act and subsection (8) of
Section 12 of this Act shall be governed by this subsection and the voting requirements of subsection
(9) of Section 12 of this Act.
(b) A request to defer an informational review for an administrative regulation that was placed on the
legislative committee's agenda may be granted if:
1. The administrative body submits a written letter to the regulations compiler;
2. The letter is received prior to the legislative committee meeting; and
3. Approved by the presiding chair or chairs.
(c) A request for deferral of an informational review for an administrative regulation may be granted at
the discretion of the legislative committee if the request is made by the administrative body orally at a
meeting of the legislative committee.
(d) An informational review for an administrative regulation that is deferred may be placed on a
subsequent agenda of the legislative committee.
(6) Except as provided by KRS 13A.290(4), if a representative of an administrative body with authority to
amend, defer, and answer questions about a filed ordinary or emergency[whose] administrative regulation
that is on the agenda[is scheduled] for full review fails to appear before a legislative committee, the
legislative committee in conformance with KRS 13A.290(9) may:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(a) Defer the administrative regulation to a subsequent[the next regularly scheduled] meeting of the
legislative committee within the review period; and[or]
(b) Make a determination pursuant to KRS 13A.030(2), (3), and (4) or 13A.190(3).
(7) If a representative of an administrative body with authority to defer and answer questions about an
administrative regulation that was placed on the agenda for informational review pursuant to subsection (3)
or (4) of Section 18 of this Act and subsection (8) of Section 12 of this Act fails to appear before the
legislative committee, the legislative committee in conformance with subsection (9) of Section 12 of this Act
may:
(a) Defer the informational review for the administrative regulation to a subsequent meeting of the
legislative committee; and
(b) Make a determination pursuant to subsections (2), (3), and (4) of Section 18 of this Act or subsection
(3) of Section 3 of this Act.
(8) An administrative regulation found deficient by a legislative committee may be deferred in accordance with
KRS 13A.020(4), Section 12 of this Act, and this section.
Section 14. KRS 13A.312 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If authority over a subject matter is transferred to another administrative body or if the name of an
administrative body is changed by statute or by executive order during the interim between regular sessions of
the General Assembly, the administrative regulations of that administrative body in effect on the effective date
of the statutory change or the executive order shall remain in effect as they exist until the administrative body
that has been granted authority over the subject matter amends or repeals the administrative regulations
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A.
(2) After receipt of a written request, submitted pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, to make changes to an
administrative regulation pursuant to the statutory change or executive order, the regulations compiler shall
alter the administrative regulations referenced in subsection (1) of this section to:
(a) Change the name of the administrative body pursuant to the provisions of the statute or executive order;
and
(b) Make any other technical changes necessary to carry out the provisions of the statute or executive order
if the changes do not affect the scope or substance of the administrative regulation.
(3) (a) The administrative body that has been granted statutory authority over the subject matter shall provide
to the regulations compiler in writing and in an electronic format approved by the regulations
compiler:
1.[(a)] A listing of the administrative regulations that require any changes; and
2.[(b)] The specific names, terms, or other information to be changed, marked in the complete text of
the existing administrative regulation in the format prescribed by KRS 13A.222(2).
(b) If there are differences between the paper copy and the electronic version, the electronic version
shall be the controlling version[with those changes properly referenced].
(4) The administrative body that has been granted statutory authority over the subject matter shall submit new
forms to replace forms previously incorporated by reference in an administrative regulation if the only changes
on the form are the name and mailing address of the administrative body. If there are additional changes to a
form incorporated by reference, the administrative body shall promulgate an amendment to the existing
administrative regulation and make the changes to the material incorporated by reference in accordance with
KRS 13A.2255.
(5) If an administrative body is abolished by statute or executive order and the authority over its subject matter is
not transferred to another administrative body, the Governor, or the secretary of the cabinet to which the
administrative body was attached, shall promulgate an administrative regulation to repeal the existing
administrative regulations that were promulgated by the abolished administrative body. The repeal shall be
accomplished as provided by KRS 13A.310.
(6) If an executive order transfers authority over a subject matter to another administrative body or changes the
name of an administrative body during the interim between regular sessions of the General Assembly, and the
General Assembly does not codify or confirm the executive order during the next regular session, any and all

CHAPTER 88 25
administrative regulations promulgated to implement the unconfirmed executive order shall be returned to
their previous form by the administrative body using the promulgation procedures established by KRS Chapter
13A, including but not limited to:
(a) Withdrawal of a proposed administrative regulation;
(b) Amendment or repeal of an existing administrative regulation;
(c) Promulgation of a new administrative regulation; or
(d) Submission of technical changes in the manner established by subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
Section 15. KRS 13A.315 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An administrative regulation shall expire and shall not be reviewed by a legislative committee if:
(a) It has not been reviewed or approved by the official or administrative body with authority to review or
approve;
(b) The statement of consideration and, if applicable, the amended after comments version are not filed on
or before a deadline specified by this chapter;
(c) The administrative body has failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter governing the filing of
administrative regulations, the public hearing and public comment period, or the statement of
consideration; or
(d) The administrative regulation is deferred pursuant to KRS 13A.300(2) more than twelve (12) times.
(2) (a) An administrative regulation that has been found deficient by a legislative committee shall be
withdrawn immediately if, pursuant to KRS 13A.330, the Governor has determined that it shall be
withdrawn.
(b) The Governor shall notify the regulations compiler in writing[ and by telephone] that he or she has
determined that the administrative regulation found deficient shall be withdrawn.
(c) The written withdrawal of an administrative regulation governed by the provisions of this subsection
shall be made in a letter to the regulations compiler in the following format: "Pursuant to KRS 13A.330,
I have determined that (administrative regulation number and title) shall be (withdrawn, or withdrawn
and amended to conform to the finding of deficiency, as applicable). The administrative regulation,
(administrative regulation number and title), is hereby withdrawn."
(d) An administrative regulation governed by the provisions of this subsection shall be considered
withdrawn upon receipt by the regulations compiler of the written withdrawal.
Section 16. KRS 13A.320 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) An administrative body may amend a filed ordinary or emergency[an] administrative regulation at a
legislative committee meeting with the consent of the legislative committee. A legislative committee
may amend a filed ordinary or emergency[an] administrative regulation at a legislative committee
meeting with the consent of the administrative body.
(b) An administrative regulation shall not be amended at a public meeting of a legislative committee unless
the amendment concerns an issue that was related to the administrative regulation filed with the
Legislative Research Commission and was:
1. Considered at the public hearing;
2. Raised pursuant to a comment received by the administrative body at the public hearing or
during the public comment period pursuant to KRS 13A.280(1); or
3. Raised during the legislative committee meeting.
(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require the administrative regulation's resubmission or
refiling or other action. The administrative regulation may be adopted as amended.
(d) Following approval of an amendment to an administrative regulation at a legislative committee
meeting, the administrative regulation as amended shall be published in the Administrative Register,
unless all amendments to the administrative regulation that were made at the meeting of the legislative
committee:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Relate only to the formatting and drafting requirements of KRS 13A.220(5) and 13A.222(4)(b),
(c), (i), (j), and (l); and
2. Do not alter the intent, meaning, conditions, standards, or other requirements of the
administrative regulation.
(e) If the amendments to an administrative regulation made at a meeting of a legislative committee meet
the exception requirements of paragraph (d) of this subsection, the regulations compiler shall publish a
notice in the Administrative Register that the administrative regulation was amended at a legislative
committee meeting only to comply with the formatting and drafting requirements of this chapter.
(2) If[When] an administrative body intends to amend an administrative regulation at a meeting of a legislative
committee, the following requirements shall be met:
(a) An amendment[Amendments] offered by the administrative body prior to a legislative committee
meeting shall be approved by the head of the administrative body;[.]
(b) The amendment[Amendments] shall be contained in a letter to the legislative committee. The letter
shall:
1. Identify the administrative body;
2. State the number and title of the administrative regulation;
3. Be dated; and
4. Be filed with the regulations compiler; and[ at least three (3) workdays prior to the meeting of
the legislative committee if the amendments are initiated by the administrative body; and
5. Comply with the format requirements in paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection if the
amendments are initiated by the administrative body.]
(c) The amendment shall be made in one (1) of the following formats:
1. a. On separate lines, the amendment shall be identified by the number of the:
i.[1.] Page;
ii.[2.] Section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, clause, or subclause, as appropriate;
and
iii.[3.] Line.
b.[(d) 1.] If a word or phrase, whether or not underlined, is to be deleted, the amendment
shall identify the word or phrase to be deleted and state that it is to be deleted. If a word or
phrase is to be replaced by another word or phrase, the amendment shall specify the word
or phrase that is to be deleted and shall specify the word or phrase that is to be inserted in
lieu thereof.
c.[2.] If new language is to be inserted, the amendment shall state that it is to be inserted, and
the new language shall be underlined.
d.[3.] If the amendment consists of no more than four (4) words, the words shall be placed
between quotation marks. If the amendment consists of more than four (4) words, the
amendment shall be indented and not placed between quotation marks.
e.[4.] If a section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, clause, or subclause is to be deleted in
its entirety, the amendment shall identify it and state that it is deleted in its entirety,
whether or not it contains underlined or bracketed language[.
(3) If an amendment is drafted by legislative committee staff on behalf of a legislative committee, the amendment
shall be made:
(a) In the format required by subsection (2)(c) and (d) of this section]; or
2. a.[(b)] By substituting the complete text of the administrative regulation, with the proposed
changes made to the administrative regulation typed in bold, italicized, and in the format
prescribed by KRS 13A.222(2).
b. i. If the amendment is initiated by the administrative body, the administrative body

CHAPTER 88 27
shall submit at the same time as, or prior to, filing the paper version, an
electronic version of the amendment in a format approved by the regulations
compiler.
ii. If there are differences between the paper copy and the electronic version of
the amendment, the electronic version shall be the controlling version.
(3) If the amendment is initiated by the administrative body, the amendment shall be:
(a) Filed at least three (3) working days prior to the meeting of the legislative committee;
(b) Filed with an updated fiscal note as established by subsection (4) of Section 8 of this Act;
(c) Filed with a summary of the amendment and an explanation of its intent; and
(d) Emailed as soon as practicable to every person who has registered pursuant to subsection (3)(a)2. of
Section 10 of this Act and provided an email address as part of the registration request.
(4) An amendment to an administrative regulation may be made orally at a legislative committee meeting if the
requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section are met.
(5) Except for an amendment made orally pursuant to subsection (4) of this section:
(a) For a meeting of the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee, an administrative body shall
submit fifteen (15)[twenty (20)] copies of an amendment to an administrative regulation to the
regulations compiler prior to the Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee meeting at which
the amendment will be considered and, if applicable, in accordance with the deadline established in
subsection (3)(a)[(2)(b)4.] of this section; or
(b) For a meeting of a legislative committee other than the Administrative Regulation Review
Subcommittee, an administrative body shall contact the regulations compiler prior to the legislative
committee meeting at which the amendment will be considered to find out the number of copies needed
for that specific legislative committee. The original amendment and the specified number of copies
shall be submitted to the regulations compiler prior to the legislative committee meeting at which the
amendment will be considered and, if applicable, in accordance with the deadline established in
subsection (3)(a)[(2)(b)4.] of this section.
Section 17. KRS 13A.335 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A filed administrative regulation found deficient by a legislative committee shall not be considered
deficient if:
1. A subsequent amendment of that administrative regulation is filed with the Commission by the
administrative body;
2. The legislative committee that found the administrative regulation deficient approves a motion
that the subsequent amendment corrects the deficiency; and
3. Any legislative committee that reviews the administrative regulation under the provisions of
KRS Chapter 13A finds that the administrative regulation is not deficient.
(b) A filed administrative regulation found deficient by the Administrative Regulation Review
Subcommittee shall not be considered deficient if:
1. The administrative regulation is amended to correct the deficiency at a meeting of a[the]
legislative committee[ to which it was assigned by the Commission];
2. A[That] legislative committee does not determine that the administrative regulation is deficient
for any other reason; and
3. The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee approves a motion that the deficiency has
been corrected and that the administrative regulation should not be considered deficient.
(c) A filed administrative regulation found deficient by a legislative committee[ with subject matter
jurisdiction] shall not be considered deficient if the legislative committee:
1. Reconsiders the administrative regulation and its finding of deficiency; and
2. Approves a motion that the administrative regulation is not deficient.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

28 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) If an amendment to an effective administrative regulation is going through the KRS Chapter 13A
promulgation process and is found deficient by a legislative committee, the administrative regulation
shall not be considered deficient if the:
1. Administrative regulation was found deficient due to the amendment;
2. Promulgating administrative body has withdrawn the proposed amendment of the existing
administrative regulation; and
3. Regulations compiler has not received the Governor's determination pursuant to KRS 13A.330.
(2) If an effective administrative regulation is found deficient by a legislative committee, the administrative
regulation shall not be considered deficient if the legislative committee:
(a) Reconsiders the administrative regulation and its finding of deficiency; and
(b) Approves a motion that the administrative regulation is not deficient.
(3) (a) If an administrative regulation has been found deficient by a legislative committee, the regulations
compiler shall add the following notice to the administrative regulation: "This administrative regulation
was found deficient by the [name of legislative committee] on [date]." This notice shall be the last
section of the administrative regulation.
(b) If an administrative regulation has been found deficient by a legislative committee, subsequent
amendments of that administrative regulation filed with the Commission shall contain the notice
provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(c) If an administrative regulation that has been found deficient by a legislative committee has
subsequently been determined not to be deficient under the provisions of this section, the regulations
compiler shall delete the notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection.
Section 18. KRS 13A.030 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Administrative Regulation Review Subcommittee shall:
(a) Conduct a continuous study as to whether additional legislation or changes in legislation are needed
based on various factors, including[,] but not limited to, review of new, emergency, and existing
administrative regulations, the lack of administrative regulations, and the needs of administrative
bodies;
(b) Except as provided by KRS 158.6471 and 158.6472, review and comment upon effective administrative
regulations pursuant to subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section or administrative regulations filed
with the Commission;
(c) Make recommendations for changes in statutes, new statutes, repeal of statutes affecting administrative
regulations or the ability of administrative bodies to promulgate them; and
(d) Conduct such other studies relating to administrative regulations as may be assigned by the
Commission.
(2) The subcommittee may make a determination:
(a) That an effective administrative regulation or an administrative regulation filed with the Commission is
deficient because it:
1. Is wrongfully promulgated;
2. Appears to be in conflict with an existing statute;
3. Appears to have no statutory authority for its promulgation;
4. Appears to impose stricter or more burdensome state requirements than required by the federal
mandate, without reasonable justification;
5. Fails to use tiering when tiering is applicable;
6. Is in excess of the administrative body's authority;
7. Appears to impose an unreasonable burden on government or small business, or both;

CHAPTER 88 29
8. Is filed as an emergency administrative regulation without adequate justification of the
emergency nature of the situation as described in KRS 13A.190(1);
9. Has not been noticed in conformance with the requirements of KRS 13A.270(3);
10. Does not provide an adequate cost analysis pursuant to KRS 13A.250;[ or]
11. Was the subject of the subcommittee's instruction to an administrative body to appear under
subsection (4) of this section and the administrative body failed to:
a. Appear;
b. Make a good-faith effort to answer subcommittee questions; or
c. Provide any information or data required by the subcommittee; or
12. Appears to be deficient in any other manner;
(b) That an administrative regulation is needed to implement an existing statute; or
(c) That an administrative regulation should be amended or repealed.
(3) The subcommittee may conduct an informational review of an effective administrative regulation or an
administrative regulation filed with the Commission if requested by a member of the subcommittee.
(4) (a) The subcommittee may require any administrative body to appear before it to answer questions or
submit data and information as required by the subcommittee in the performance of its duties under this
chapter, and no administrative body shall fail to:
1. Appear before the subcommittee;
2. Make a good-faith effort to answer subcommittee questions;
3. Provide any[the] information or data required by the subcommittee; or
4. Perform any combination of subparagraphs 1., 2., and 3. of this paragraph required by the
subcommittee.
(b) Either co-chair of the subcommittee may require action by an administrative body under paragraph
(a) of this subsection on behalf of the subcommittee.
(5) At least five (5) calendar days before an informational review of an ordinary administrative regulation, the
subcommittee shall notify the affected administrative body.
Signed by Governor March 25, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version